Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1012
Historical redevelopment, defined.

Historical
redevelopment means a real estate development project that redevelops a historic
building, as listed on either the National Register of Historic Places or
the Nebraska Historic Buildings Survey. The reuse of the historic building
can be any approved use, including retail for an entertainment destination
center or a mixed-use project.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 12.